Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.311

Distribution of interest from brokers' trust accounts.

Remittances received by the state treasurer pursuant to RCW 18.85.285 shall be divided between the housing trust fund created by RCW 43.185A.130, which shall receive seventy-five percent and the real estate education program account created by RCW 18.85.321, which shall receive twenty-five percent.

[ 2023 c 275 s 14; 2008 c 23 s 38; 1993 c 50 s 3; 1987 c 513 s 9. Formerly RCW 18.85.315.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 50: See note following RCW 18.85.061.

Effective date—Severability—1987 c 513: See notes following RCW 18.85.285.